src/import/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON An_me
 ma+V+indic+pres+ps1+pl+ps+af:+me GI;
 ma+V+indic+pres+ps2+pl+ps+af:+te GI;
 ma+V+indic+pres+ps3+pl+ps+af:+vad GI;

!!!!!

!!!!!
! Umbisikuline tegumood
!!!!!

LEXICON An_tud
 ma+V+partic+past+imps:+tud GI ;
 ma+V+indic+impf+imps+neg:+tud GI ;
 ma+V+indic+impf+imps+af:+ti GI ;
 ma+V+cond+pres+imps:+taks GI ;
 ma+V+cond+past+imps:+tuks GI ;
 ma+V+quot+pres+imps:+tavat GI ;
 ma+V+quot+past+imps:+tuvat GI ;
 ma+V+imper+pres+imps:+tagu GI ;
 ma+V+sup+imps:+tama GI ;
 ma+V+indic+pres+imps+neg:+ta GI ;
 ma+V+partic+pres+imps:+tav GI ;

 $tud+A:+tud GI ;
 $tud+S:+tud GI ;
 $tu+A:+tu 01 ;
 $tu+S:+tu 01 ;
 $tav+A:+tav 02_A ;
 $tav+S:+tav 02_A ;

LEXICON An_dud
 ma+V+partic+past+imps:+dud GI ;
 ma+V+indic+impf+imps+neg:+dud GI ;
 ma+V+indic+impf+imps+af:+di GI ;
 ma+V+cond+pres+imps:+daks GI ;
 ma+V+cond+past+imps:+duks GI ;
 ma+V+quot+pres+imps:+davat GI ;
 ma+V+quot+past+imps:+duvat GI ;
 ma+V+imper+pres+imps:+dagu GI ;
 ma+V+sup+imps:+dama GI ;
 ma+V+indic+pres+imps+neg:+da GI ;
 ma+V+partic+pres+imps:+dav GI ;

 $dud+A:+dud GI ;
 $dud+S:+dud GI ;
 $du+S:+du 01 ;
 $du+A:+du 01 ;
 $dav+A:+dav 02_A ;
 $dav+S:+dav 02_A ;

LEXICON An_takse
 ma+V+indic+pres+imps+af:+takse GI ;

LEXICON An_dakse
 ma+V+indic+pres+imps+af:+dakse GI ;

LEXICON An_akse
 ma+V+indic+pres+imps+af:+akse GI ;

!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Produktiivne verbituletus (v,tav,nud,nu,tud,tu on analoogiarühmade all)
!!!!!!
LEXICON Deriv_mine_ja
  ja+S:+ja 01;
  mine+S:+mi 12_NE-SE-S;

LEXICON Deriv_ja
  ja+S:+ja 01;

LEXICON Deriv_mine
  mine+S:+mi 12_NE-SE-S;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! liitsõnade moodustamine

LEXICON LIIT

LIIT; ! tupikuks..
!& Nimisõna;
!& Omadussõna;
!& Tegusõna; ! vähemalt tuletiste jaoks on seda vaja.


!LEXICON LIIT_DEV_P
!+:& Deverbaal_P;

!LEXICON LIIT_DEV_G
!+:& Deriv_mine_ja;

LEXICON GI  ! liide gi/ki
 +gi:Q1i #;
 #;

LEXICON Kohalikud_erandid
 vähK1re:vähK1er$ An_dud;
 vähK1re:vähK1er$ An_dakse;
LEXICON Tüved
 absoluutselt+Adv:absoluutselt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 aga+Adv:aga GI; ! (41_JD -> +Adv +J) 
 aijeh+I:aijeh GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 ajalt+Adv:ajalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 alamale+Adv:alamale GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 alistunult+Adv:alistunult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ammugi+Adv:ammugi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 aplalt+Adv:aplalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 aruldasa+Adv:aruldasa GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 asemele+K:asemele GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 aukus+A:aukus GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 belutši+G:belutši GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 eales+Adv:eales GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 eelnevalt+Adv:eelnevalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 egiptuse+G:egiptuse GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 eksi+Adv:eksi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 eluliselt+Adv:eluliselt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 enne+K:enne GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 eraldi+Adv:eraldi GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 erkvele+Adv:erkvele GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 fiktiivselt+Adv:fiktiivselt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hahaa+I:hahaa GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 hakul+K:hakul GI; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 hapralt+Adv:hapralt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 harevile+Adv:harevile GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hass+I:hass GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 heldinult+Adv:heldinult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hiljakult+Adv:hiljakult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hirmsasti+Adv:hirmsasti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 homme+Adv:homme GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hopp+I:hopp GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 hulga+Adv:hulga GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hurjeh+I:hurjeh GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 härdalt+Adv:härdalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 hõlpsasti+Adv:hõlpsasti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 igati+Adv:igati GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ikkagi+Adv:ikkagi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ilmsiks+Adv:ilmsiks GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 iraani+G:iraani GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 islami+G:islami GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 jaa+Adv:jaa GI; ! (41_DI -> +Adv +I) 
 jalas+Adv:jalas GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 jaoti+Adv:jaoti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 jokkis+A:jokkis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 joonia+G:joonia GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 julgesti+Adv:julgesti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 jutti+Adv:jutti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 jälle+Adv:jälle GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 järgselt+Adv:järgselt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 jõllis+Adv:jõllis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 jõus+Adv:jõus GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kabinal+Adv:kabinal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kaheti+Adv:kaheti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kahukil+Adv:kahukil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kallale+K:kallale GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kannul+K:kannul GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 karaiimi+G:karaiimi GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 karnauhti+Adv:karnauhti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kartveli+G:kartveli GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 kaua+Adv:kaua GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kauh+I:kauh GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 keeliti+Adv:keeliti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 keksti+Adv:keksti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kerkvel+Adv:kerkvel GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kesse+Pron:kesse GI; ! (41_P -> +Pron) 
 kihkvel+A:kihkvel GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kiivas+A:kiivas GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kimbus+Adv:kimbus GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kirkalt+Adv:kirkalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 klirdi+Adv:klirdi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kobarati+Adv:kobarati GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kohal+Adv:kohal GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kohinal+Adv:kohinal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 koks+I:koks GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 kolmeti+Adv:kolmeti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kondenseeritud+A:kondenseeritud GI; ! (41_A -> +A) 
 koomal+Adv:koomal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 korinal+Adv:korinal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 krampis+Adv:krampis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 krussis+A:krussis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kuigi+J:kuigi GI; ! (41_JD -> +Adv +J) 
 kunagi+Adv:kunagi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kuskil+Adv:kuskil GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kägarasse+Adv:kägarasse GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kärinal+Adv:kärinal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kõhevil+Adv:kõhevil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 kõpsti+Adv:kõpsti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 kõveras+A:kõveras GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 köögakil+A:köögakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 küljes+K:küljes GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 küütsakil+A:küütsakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 lahtisi+Adv:lahtisi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 latsakil+A:latsakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 lesgiini+G:lesgiini GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 liiatigi+Adv:liiatigi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 loginal+Adv:loginal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 loodi+Adv:loodi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 lossis+Adv:lossis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 läbi+K:läbi GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 läägelt+Adv:läägelt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 lömakile+Adv:lömakile GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 lüngi+Adv:lüngi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 maksvele+Adv:maksvele GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 matsti+Adv:matsti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 minaks+X:minaks GI; ! (41_X -> +X) 
 mossi+Adv:mossi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 munele+Adv:munele GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 mõistu+Adv:mõistu GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 na+Adv:na GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 napsti+Adv:napsti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ninakil+Adv:ninakil GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 nuppus+Adv:nuppus GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 närvalt+Adv:närvalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 nühakil+Adv:nühakil GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 oo+I:oo GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 otsata+Adv:otsata GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 pah+I:pah GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 pakku+Adv:pakku GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 paremal+Adv:paremal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 pealt+K:pealt GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 perseli+Adv:perseli GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 pilgel+Adv:pilgel GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 pinnalt+K:pinnalt GI; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 plärinal+Adv:plärinal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 pooleldi+Adv:pooleldi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 priginal+Adv:priginal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 puginal+Adv:puginal GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 punaselt+Adv:punaselt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 puštu+G:puštu GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 pääl+K:pääl GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 põrgulikult+Adv:põrgulikult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 raidu+I:raidu GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 ratsa+Adv:ratsa GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 rihtis+A:rihtis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 ripakil+A:ripakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 rooste+Adv:rooste GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 rängalt+Adv:rängalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 rühmiti+Adv:rühmiti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 saksikult+Adv:saksikult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 sattumisi+Adv:sattumisi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 selili+Adv:selili GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 servi+Adv:servi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 silumisi+Adv:silumisi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 sitasti+Adv:sitasti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 soodu+Adv:soodu GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 sotsti+Adv:sotsti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 sumeri+G:sumeri GI; ! (41_G -> +G) 
 suunda+K:suunda GI; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 sõltuvalt+Adv:sõltuvalt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 süvenenult+Adv:süvenenult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 tahtsi+Adv:tahtsi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 tarvis+K:tarvis GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 teisale+Adv:teisale GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 tiidakil+Adv:tiidakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 tohoh+I:tohoh GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 tossis+A:tossis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 tsurr+I:tsurr GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 tunniti+Adv:tunniti GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 täielt+Adv:täielt GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 tõttu+Adv:tõttu GI; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tümps+I:tümps GI; ! (41_I -> +I) 
 upakil+A:upakil GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 uurakile+Adv:uurakile GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 vahetult+Adv:vahetult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 valmis+A:valmis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 varjatult+Adv:varjatult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 veel+Adv:veel GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 viikis+A:viikis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 viltu+Adv:viltu GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 vissis+A:vissis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 vurhvis+A:vurhvis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 välja+Adv:välja GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 võimalikult+Adv:võimalikult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ähmis+A:ähmis GI; ! (41_DA -> +Adv +A) 
 õhetavi+Adv:õhetavi GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 õnnestunult+Adv:õnnestunult GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 üksa+Adv:üksa GI; ! (41_D -> +Adv) 
 ümbert+K:ümbert GI; ! (41_K -> +K) 
LEXICON Lisanduvad_erandid
 julgema+V+partic+past+imps:juletud GI; ! 27_V,j'ulge,jule[tud],411--0--,-,-,+
 luu+S+pl+gen:luude GI; ! 26_S,l'uu,luu[de],------1G,-,-,+
 olema+V+indic+impf+ps+neg:polnud GI; ! 36_V,ole,pol[nud],-02002--,-,-,+
 puu+S+pl+kom:puudega GI; ! 26_S,p'uu,puu[dega],------1K,-,-,+
 suu+S+pl+term:suudeni GI; ! 26_S,s'uu,suu[deni],------1R,a0r,s'u,+
 töö+S+pl+el:töödest GI; ! 26_S,t'öö,töö[dest],------13,-,-,+
 öö+S+pl+es:öödena GI; ! 26_S,'öö,öö[dena],------1E,-,-,+
